Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 8. Directors and Officers.
§ 13.1-871.1.
Business opportunities.

A director’s taking advantage, directly or indirectly, of a business opportunity may not be the subject of equitable relief or give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions against the director in a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation on the ground that such opportunity should have first been offered to the corporation, if before becoming legally obligated respecting the opportunity the director brings it to the attention of the corporation and:

Directors’ action disclaiming the corporation’s interest in the opportunity is taken in compliance with the procedures set forth in subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-871

, as if the decision being made concerned a director’s conflict of interests transaction; or

Members’ action disclaiming the corporation’s interest in the opportunity is taken in compliance with the procedures set forth in subdivision A 2 of §

13.1-871

, as if the decision being made concerned a director’s conflict of interests transaction.

In any proceeding seeking equitable relief or other remedies, based upon an alleged improper taking advantage of a business opportunity by a director, the fact that the director did not employ one of the procedures described in subsection A before taking advantage of the opportunity shall not create an inference that the opportunity should have been first presented to the corporation or alter the burden of proof otherwise applicable to establish that the director breached a duty to the corporation in the circumstances.

History.

2007, c. 925.

§ 13.1-872.
Required officers.

Except as provided in an agreement authorized by §

13.1-852.1

, a corporation shall have such officers with such titles and duties as shall be stated in the bylaws or in a resolution of the board of directors that is not inconsistent with the bylaws and as may be necessary to enable it to execute documents that comply with subsection F of §

13.1-804

.

The board of directors may elect individuals to fill one or more offices of the corporation. An officer may appoint one or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The secretary or any other officer as designated in the bylaws or by resolution of the board shall have responsibility for preparing and maintaining custody of minutes of the directors’ and members’ meetings and for authenticating records of the corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in the corporation.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-226; 1956, c. 428; 1982, c. 372; 1985, c. 522; 1994, c. 189; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “Except as provided in an agreement authorized by §

13.1-852.1

, a” for “A” at the beginning of subsection A; and substituted “The board of directors may elect individuals to fill one or more offices of the corporation. An” for “A duly appointed” at the beginning of subsection B.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 149.

§ 13.1-873.
Duties of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.

History.

1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-874.
Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the corporation. A resignation is effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective time. If a resignation is made effective at a later time, the corporation may fill the pending vacancy before the effective time if the successor does not take office until the effective time.

A board of directors may remove any officer at any time with or without cause and any officer or assistant officer, if appointed by another officer, may likewise be removed by such officer. Election or appointment of an officer shall not of itself create any contract rights in the officer or the corporation. An officer’s removal does not affect such officer’s contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer’s resignation does not affect the corporation’s contract rights, if any, with the officer.

Any person who has resigned as an officer of a corporation, or whose name is incorrectly on file with the Commission as an officer of a corporation, may file a statement to that effect with the Commission.

Upon the resignation or removal of an officer, the corporation may file an amended annual report with the Commission indicating the resignation or removal of the officer and the successor in office, if any.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-227; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1990, c. 282; 1991, c. 124; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925, in subsection A, substituted “effective time” for “effective date” three times and “later time, the corporation” for “later date and the corporation accepts the future effective date, it” in the last sentence; added the next-to-last and last sentences in subsection B; and added “if any” at the end in subsection D.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).